Utah statutes.
17-50-501.   Classification of counties.

(1)  Each county shall be classified according to its population.

(2) (a)  A county with a population of 700,000 or more is a county of the first class.

(b)  A county with a population of 125,000 or more but less than 700,000 is a county of the second class.

(c)  A county with a population of 31,000 or more but less than 125,000 is a county of the third class.

(d)  A county with a population of 11,000 or more but less than 31,000 is a county of the fourth class.

(e)  A county with a population of 4,000 or more but less than 11,000 is a county of the fifth class.

(f)  A county with a population less than 4,000 is a county of the sixth class.

